test/src/morphology/adj-båadtsoeh_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - båadtsah: # 
    båadtsah+A+Attr: båadtsah 
    båadtsah+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [båadtsahkåbpoe, båadtsahkabpa]
    båadtsah+A+Sg+Nom: båadtsan 
    båadtsah+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [båadtsahkammes, båadtsahkommes]

  Adjective - båadtsoeh: # 
    båadtsoeh+A+Attr: båadtsoeh 
    båadtsoeh+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [båadtsahkåbpoe, båadtsahkabpa]
    båadtsoeh+A+Sg+Nom: båadtsan 
    båadtsoeh+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [båadtsahkammes, båadtsahkommes]

  Adjective - feejjene: # 
    feejjene+A+Attr: feejjene 
    feejjene+A+Sg+Nom: feejjene 

  Adjective - læhkoeladtje: # 
    læhkoeladtje+A+Attr: læhkoeladtje 
    læhkoeladtje+A+Sg+Nom: læhkoeladtje 

  Adjective - rudtjege: # 
    rudtjege+A+Attr: rudtjege 
    rudtjege+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [rudtjegåbpoe]
    rudtjege+A+Sg+Nom: rudtjege 
    rudtjege+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [rudtjegommes]

  Adjective - rudtjeh: # 
    rudtjeh+A+Attr: rudtjeh 
    rudtjeh+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [rudtjebe]
    rudtjeh+A+Sg+Nom: rudtjege 
    rudtjeh+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [rudtjemes]
